Washington statutes.
RCW 35.82.076

Small works roster.

A housing authority may establish and use a small works roster for awarding contracts under RCW 39.04.151 through 39.04.154.

[ 2023 c 395 s 23; 2000 c 138 s 205.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 395 ss 1-30, 32-34, 36, and 37: See note following RCW 39.04.010.

Findings—Intent—2023 c 395: See note following RCW 39.04.010.

Purpose—Part headings not law—2000 c 138: See notes following RCW 39.04.010.